Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.04.169

Short term.

"Short term" means the brief period of time starting upon certification of the general election or issuance of a certificate of election, and ending with the start of the next full term, and is applicable only when there has been a vacancy in the office after the last election at which such office could have been voted upon for an unexpired term. Short term elections are always held in conjunction with elections for the full term for the office.

[ 2013 c 11 s 6; 2003 c 111 s 130; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 120 s 14. Formerly RCW 29.01.180.]

NOTES:

Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 120: See note following RCW 29A.52.210.